Washington statutes.
RCW 10.82.020

Stay of execution for sixty days on recognizance.

Every defendant against whom a judgment has been rendered for fine and costs, may stay the execution for the fine assessed and costs for sixty days from the rendition of the judgment, by procuring one or more sufficient sureties, to enter into a recognizance in open court, acknowledging themselves to be bail for such fine and costs.

[Code 1881 s 1123; 1873 p 242 s 281; 1854 p 124 s 145; RRS s 2204. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1124; 1873 p 243 s 282; 1854 p 124 s 146; RRS s 2205, now codified as RCW 10.82.025.]